Connecticut, session 2026, SB00101.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to establish a state-wide
property tax at the rate of (1) 2 mills on residential real property with an
assessed value of more than three million dollars but less than five
million dollars, (2) 3 mills on residential real property with an assessed
value of five million dollars or more but less than ten million dollars,
and (3) 4 mills on residential real property with an assessed value of ten
million dollars or more.